Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202021-501
Short title.

Sections 21-501 to 21-542 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Protected Series Act.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 2.
January 1, 2021